Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-503
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Public Water and Natural Resources Project Contracting Act is to provide the department alternative methods of contracting for public water and natural resources projects. The alternative methods of contracting shall be available to the department for use on any project regardless of the funding source. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, the Public Water and Natural Resources Project Contracting Act shall govern the design-build, progressive design-build, and construction manager-general contractor procurement processes.

Laws 2023, LB565, § 3.